District of Columbia statutes.
42-2705.03

Annual report by Agency; contents.

The Agency shall, within 90 days of the end of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Mayor, the Council, and the Advisory Board. The report shall set forth a complete operating financial statement of the Agency during the fiscal year it covers, its housing program operations and accomplishments, the names of all new employees and their pay schedules, titles, and place of residence, its plans for the succeeding fiscal year, and its recommendations for needed action on the part of the Mayor or Council, with respect to the purposes of the Agency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 503, 25 DCR 5008
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 215(b), 54 DCR 10993
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 223(g), 56 DCR 1117
This section is referenced in § 42-2704.01.
1981 Ed., § 45-2153.
1973 Ed., § 45-1929.
D.C. Law 17-108 substituted “accomplishments, and the names of all new employees and their pay schedules, titles, and place of residence,” for “accomplishments,”.
D.C. Law 17-353 substituted “the names” for “and the names”.